Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.200

Education of pupils in another district—Limitation as to state apportionment—Exemption.

(1) A local district may be authorized by the educational service district superintendent to transport and educate its pupils in other districts for one year, either by payment of a compensation agreed upon by such school districts, or under other terms mutually satisfactory to the districts concerned when this will afford better educational facilities for the pupils and when a saving may be effected in the cost of education. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount to be paid by the state to the resident school district for apportionment purposes and otherwise payable pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 through 28A.150.290, 28A.150.350 through 28A.150.410, 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.200, 28A.300.035, and 28A.300.170 shall not be greater than the regular apportionment for each high school student of the receiving district. Such authorization may be extended for an additional year at the discretion of the educational service district superintendent.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to districts participating in a cooperative project established under RCW 28A.340.030 which exceeds two years in duration or to nonhigh school districts participating in an interdistrict cooperative under RCW 28A.340.080 through 28A.340.090.

[ 2010 c 99 s 6; (2010 c 99 s 5 expired September 1, 2011); 2009 c 548 s 706; 1990 c 33 s 234; 1988 c 268 s 6; 1979 ex.s. c 140 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 111; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 141; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.225. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 154 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.58.225, 28.24.110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 99 s 6: "Section 6 of this act takes effect September 1, 2011." [ 2010 c 99 s 13.]

Expiration date—2010 c 99 s 5: "Section 5 of this act expires September 1, 2011." [ 2010 c 99 s 12.]

Findings—Intent—2010 c 99: See note following RCW 28A.340.080.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Findings—Severability—1988 c 268: See notes following RCW 28A.340.010.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 140: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 140 s 4.]

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.